Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.440

Liability of member for breach of marketing contract.

The marketing contract may fix, as liquidated damages, specific sums to be paid by the member to the association upon the breach by him or her of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of fishery products; and may further provide that the member will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses, and fees, in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association; and any such provisions shall be valid and enforceable in the courts of this state; and such clauses providing for liquidated damages shall be enforceable as such and shall not be regarded as penalties.

[ 2011 c 336 s 681; 1959 c 312 s 44.]